Washington statutes.
RCW 41.32.584

Additional benefit for justices or judges—One-time irrevocable election.

(1) Between January 1, 2007, and December 31, 2007, a member of plan 1 employed as a supreme court justice, court of appeals judge, or superior court judge may make a one-time irrevocable election, filed in writing with the member's employer, the department, and the administrative office of the courts, to accrue an additional benefit equal to one and one-half percent of average final compensation for each year of future service credit from the date of the election.

(2)(a) A member who chooses to make the election under subsection (1) of this section may apply to the department to increase the member's benefit multiplier by one and one-half percent per year of service for the period in which the member served as a justice or judge prior to the election. The member may purchase, beginning with the most recent judicial service, the higher benefit multiplier for up to seventy percent of that portion of the member's prior judicial service that would ensure that the member has no more than a seventy-five percent of average final compensation benefit accrued by age sixty-four. The member shall pay five percent of the salary earned for each month of service for which the higher benefit multiplier is being purchased, plus interest as determined by the director. The purchase price shall not exceed the actuarially equivalent value of the increase in the member's benefit resulting from the increase in the benefit multiplier. This payment must be made prior to retirement and prior to December 31, 2007. After December 31, 2007, a member may purchase the higher benefit multiplier for any of the member's prior judicial service at the actuarially equivalent value of the increase in the member's benefit resulting from the increase in the benefit multiplier, as determined by the director.

(b) Subject to rules adopted by the department, a member applying to increase the member's benefit multiplier under this section may pay all or part of the cost with a lump sum payment, eligible rollover, direct rollover, or trustee-to-trustee transfer from an eligible retirement plan. The department shall adopt rules to ensure that all lump sum payments, rollovers, and transfers comply with the requirements of the internal revenue code and regulations adopted by the internal revenue service. The rules adopted by the department may condition the acceptance of a rollover or transfer from another plan on the receipt of information necessary to enable the department to determine the eligibility of any transferred funds for tax-free rollover treatment or other treatment under federal income tax law.

[ 2007 c 123 s 5; 2006 c 189 s 7.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2006 c 189: See note following RCW 2.14.115.